Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
109

STADIUMS
AND RECREATIONAL FACILITIES

Section

109-1 Stadium authority; appointment, terms

109-2 Stadium authority; powers and duties

109-3 Stadium special fund

109-4 Employee benefits

109-5 Security personnel, powers

109-6 Stadium special account

109-7 Enforcement; penalty

109-8 Lost and found money or property at the
stadium

109-9 Repealed

Note

Chapter heading amended by L 1999, c 160, §6.

Cross References

Hawaii sports hall of fame, see §6E-46.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next